Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.120

Civil remedies—Application of consumer protection act.

(1) An educational institution or student athlete may bring an action for damages against an athlete agent if the institution or athlete is adversely affected by an act or omission of the agent in violation of this chapter. An educational institution or student athlete is adversely affected by an act or omission of the athlete agent only if, because of the act or omission, the institution or an individual who was a student athlete at the time of the act or omission and enrolled in the institution:

(a) Is suspended or disqualified from participation in an interscholastic or intercollegiate sport event by or under the rules of a state or national federation or association that promotes or regulates interscholastic or intercollegiate sports; or

(b) Suffers financial damage.

(2) A plaintiff that prevails in an action under this section may recover actual damages and costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees. An athlete agent found liable under this section forfeits any right of payment for anything of benefit or value provided to the student athlete and shall refund any consideration paid to the athlete agent by or on behalf of the athlete.

(3) A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade and commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purposes of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 11; 2002 c 131 s 13.]